Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

11-105-101. Branch banks and practices prohibited.

Any state bank or state bank chartered in another jurisdiction, upon application to and approval by the banking board, may operate one or more loan production offices as defined by the banking board.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "elementary school" means any public or private school with students in kindergarten through eighth grade. A bank that both opens accounts and accepts students' deposits at elementary schools in conjunction with other educational programs presented by the bank is not engaged in branch banking as defined in section 11-101-401 (10). Any bank establishing a location in an elementary school pursuant to this section shall receive the prior approval of the banking board. Approval shall be granted if the program is predominantly educational.

Any other facility, agency, or paying or receiving station operated by any bank or agent shall constitute a branch within the meaning of this section. Any facility authorized by the United States treasury department shall not be subject to the limitations of this section.

As authorized under section 10-2-601 (2), C.R.S., any bank may, pursuant to federal law or under such rules as may be prescribed by the banking board and subject to rules promulgated by the commissioner of insurance concerning the sale of insurance by financial institutions as provided in section 10-2-601, C.R.S., as such laws and rules are applicable to the bank, depending upon whether such bank is a national bank or a state bank, act as the agent for any fire, life, or other insurance company authorized to do business in this state by soliciting and selling insurance and collecting premiums on policies issued by such company. For services so rendered, such bank may receive such fees or commissions as may be agreed upon between the bank and the insurance company for which it may act as agent. For purposes of this subsection (4), "bank" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 11-101-401 (3).

Except as provided in the federal "Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act", as amended, Pub.L. 106-102, 113 Stat. 1388, it is unlawful for a bank or an officer, director, employee, or affiliate of a bank to engage in the business of issuing, floating, underwriting, distributing, or promoting the sale of stocks, bonds, or other securities or to be an officer, trustee, director, employee, stockholder, or partner of any person engaged principally in any such business. Additional exceptions to this section shall be securities issued or guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or any agency thereof or by a state or territory of the United States or a subdivision, instrumentality, or public authority organized under the laws of such state or territory or pursuant to an interstate compact between two or more states.

Except as expressly permitted in this code, a state bank shall not assume liability as an insurer, nor shall it become a guarantor or endorser of any security instrument or obligation in which, or with respect to which, it has no property interest.

No officer, director, employee, or agent of a state bank shall maintain, or authorize the maintenance of, any account of the bank in a manner that, to his or her knowledge, does not conform to the requirements prescribed by this code or by the commissioner or the banking board.

No officer, director, employee, or agent of a state bank shall obstruct, or endeavor to obstruct, a lawful examination of the institution by an officer or employee of the division.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1112, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 323, § 5, effective April 7.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 2021, § 14, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1466, § 12, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-102. Accounts and interest.

A state bank may maintain demand, savings, and time deposit accounts and any type of account that a national bank may maintain.

Savings deposits shall be repaid to the depositors under such rules as the board of directors of the state bank shall, from time to time, prescribe. Such rules shall be conspicuously exposed in some place accessible and visible in the business office of the state bank. No alterations that may at any time be made in the rules shall in any manner affect the rights of a depositor within the contract period in respect to deposits made previous to such alteration.

The banking board may by rule establish the maximum annual rate of interest that a state bank may pay on any type of deposit or account. In the absence of such rule, a state bank shall be subject only to applicable federal law in the payment of interest.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1113, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-103. Saturday closing - notice - effect.

Any state bank or trust company, national banking association, or federal reserve bank may, by brief notation on its front door, fully dispense with, or restrict to such extent as it may determine, the hours within which it will be open for business on all, or less than all, Saturdays. However, the fact that a bank remains open for business on all, or less than all, Saturdays shall not make that day, or any part thereof, a banking day for the purposes of section 4-4-104 (a)(3), C.R.S., of the "Uniform Commercial Code". Any plan so adopted by any such organization may be changed by it from time to time in its discretion. Every Saturday on which any such state bank, national banking association, or federal reserve bank, in observance of such notation, is not open for business shall be, with respect to the particular organization, the equivalent of a legal holiday, as specified in section 24-11-101, C.R.S. Any act authorized, required, or permitted to be performed at, by, or with respect to such organization on a Saturday that is for it a holiday may be performed on the next succeeding business day, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law of this state to the contrary, and no liability or loss of right of any kind shall result from such delay. The provisions of this section shall not operate to invalidate or prohibit the doing on any Saturday of any such act by any person or organization referred to in this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1114, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-104. Minor or institutional deposits.

A bank may operate a deposit account for a minor with the same effect upon its liability as if the minor were of full age unless such minor's guardian or conservator files with the bank a certified copy of the order of a Colorado court having jurisdiction appointing him or her and directs otherwise.

Subject to such rules, not in conflict with section 11-105-101, as the banking board may prescribe for the protection of depositors, a bank may contract with the proper authorities of any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or any public or charitable institution caring for minors for the participation by the bank in any school or institutional thrift or savings plan.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1114, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-105. Joint deposits - right of survivor.

Except as to accounts, which are defined in and which shall be paid as provided in article 15 of title 15, C.R.S., when a bank deposit in any bank transacting business in this state is made in the names of two or more persons payable to them or to any of them, such deposit, or any part thereof or interest thereon, may be paid to any one of said persons whether the others are living or not, and the receipt or acquittance of the person so paid shall be valid and sufficient discharge to the paying bank from all said persons and their heirs, executors, administrators, and assigns; such deposit shall be deemed, so far as the rights and liabilities of the bank are concerned, to be owned by said persons in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship, but the bank has the right of setoff against such deposit, to the extent thereof, to collect a debt owed to the bank by any joint depositor, which right shall not be affected by death.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1114, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-106. Final adjustment - statement of account.

When a statement of account has been rendered by a bank to a depositor and accompanied by vouchers, if any, that are the basis for debit entries in such account, or when the depositor's passbook or savings account book has been written up by the bank, showing the condition of the depositor's account, and delivered to such depositor with like accompaniment of vouchers, if any, such account shall, after the period of one year from the date of its rendition, in the event no objection thereto has been theretofore made by the depositor, be deemed finally adjusted and settled and its correctness conclusively presumed. Such depositor shall thereafter be barred from questioning the correctness of such account for any cause.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the depositor from the duty of exercising due diligence in the examination of such account and vouchers, if any, when rendered by the bank and of immediate notification to the bank upon discovery of any error therein, nor from the legal consequences of neglect of such duty.

A statement of account may be rendered to a depositor by mailing such statement, with supporting vouchers, if any, to such depositor's address as shown on the books of the bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1115, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-107. Adverse claim deposits.

Notice to any bank of an adverse claim to a deposit standing on its books to the credit of any person, or to securities or other property deposited by any person with the bank, shall not be effectual to cause said bank to recognize said adverse claimant, unless said adverse claimant shall also either procure a restraining order, injunction, or other appropriate process against and served upon said bank from a court of competent jurisdiction in an action instituted by said adverse claimant wherein the person to whose credit the deposit stands or for whose account the securities or other property are held is made a party and served with summons or shall comply with subsection (2) of this section.

Such adverse claimant, in lieu of a court order, shall execute to said bank, in form and amount and with sureties acceptable to it, a bond indemnifying said bank from all liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses, whether on account of the payment of such adverse claim or the dishonor of the check or other order of the person to whose credit the deposit stands on the books of said bank or on account of the delivery of said securities or other property to the adverse claimant or the refusal to comply with any order of the depositor of the securities or property held, as the case may be.

This section shall not apply in any instance where the person to whose credit the deposit stands or for whose account the securities or other property is held, is a fiduciary designated as such by words indicating the deposit or other property is, or the securities are, held for the benefit of such adverse claimant, and the facts showing reasonable cause of belief on the part of said claimant that the fiduciary is about to misappropriate such deposit, securities, or other property are made to appear by the affidavit of such claimant.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1115, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-108. Transmitting money - foreign exchange.

A bank may accept money for transmission and may transmit money.

A bank may buy and sell foreign exchange to the extent necessary to meet the needs of customers.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1116, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-109. Temporary closing of banks - when.

Any bank doing business in this state may remain closed on any day on which, by reason of an occasion of national mourning or rejoicing or national or local emergency affecting the community in which such bank is located, the governor shall by proclamation request the people of the state or of said community to close their places of business.

If the banking board is of the opinion that an emergency exists affecting banks located in the state or in any part thereof, it may authorize banks located in the area affected by the emergency to close any or all of their offices, and it shall make public announcement of such authorization. In addition, if the banking board is of the opinion that an emergency exists that affects a particular bank or a particular office thereof, but not banks located in the area generally, it may authorize the particular bank or office so affected to close. As used in this subsection (2), the word "emergency" shall include any condition that may interfere with the conduct of the normal operations of, or the transportation of employees to or from, a bank or one or more offices thereof, or that poses an existing or imminent threat to the safety or security of bank personnel or property, including without limitation conditions arising by reason of fire, flood, windstorm, snowstorm, or other casualty, interruption of transportation or power facilities, war or other enemy action, riots, civil commotion, or other acts of lawlessness or violence.

If the officers of a bank are of the opinion that conditions exist that pose an existing or imminent threat to the safety or security of bank personnel or property generally or at any one or more offices thereof, they may close the bank or the office affected by such threat, as the case may be, irrespective of whether the governor or the banking board has acted under this section. As used in this section, the word "officers" shall mean the person designated by the board of directors, board of trustees, or other governing body of a bank to act for the bank in carrying out the provisions of this section or, in the absence of any such designation or the officer so designated, the president or any other officer currently in charge of the operations of the bank or of the office in question. A bank closing an office pursuant to this section shall give as prompt notice to the banking board of such action as conditions permit.

Any bank or office thereof that is closed by action of the banking board under this section may remain closed until it declares that the emergency has ended. Any bank or office thereof that is closed by decision of the officers of the bank may remain closed until such officers determine that the threat has ended. In either event, any bank or office thereof may remain closed for such further time thereafter as may reasonably be required to reopen, but in any event not later than the normal time of opening on the next business day.

Any day on which a bank remains closed and any day on which a bank or any one or more of its offices is closed during any part or all of its normal banking hours, by decision of the banking board or by decision of its officers, shall be, with respect to such bank, or if not all of its offices are closed, then with respect to those offices that are closed, the equivalent of a legal holiday, as specified in section 24-11-101, C.R.S., and any act authorized, required, or permitted to be performed at or by or with respect to such bank or such office, as the case may be, on such day may be performed on the next succeeding business day without any liability or loss of rights resulting from such delay.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1116, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-110. Disclosure of information pursuant to legal process.

Any bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or any agent or employee of such financial institutions that makes a disclosure of records or information on the direction contained in a lawful notice, subpoena, written request, search warrant, grand jury subpoena, or other process issued by any governmental authority or by a court is not civilly or criminally liable for such disclosure, nor is the financial institution liable to the customer or any other person for such disclosure.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1117, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1484, § 54, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6-113 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-111. Trust account - limited documentation required - certificate of trust.

For any transaction with any bank transacting business in this state by one or more persons expressly acting as a trustee or trustees for one or more other named person or persons pursuant to or purporting to be pursuant to a written trust agreement, a trustee may provide the bank with a certificate of trust to evidence the trust relationship. The certificate of trust must be a duly acknowledged affidavit or other written statement expressly made under penalty of perjury executed by any trustee and must include the following:

A statement that the trust exists and the date the trust instrument was executed;

The identity of the settlor;

The identity and address of the current acting trustee;

The powers of the trustee in the pending transaction;

A statement whether the trust is revocable and the identity of any person holding the power to revoke the trust;

The authority of cotrustees to sign or otherwise authenticate and whether all or fewer than all cotrustees are required in order to exercise the powers of the trustee;

The name in which title to trust property may be taken; and

Any other information that may be required by the bank, including an indemnification that is acceptable to the bank.

If a bank decides to accept a certificate of trust pursuant to this section:

For a transaction that consists of opening a deposit account, the bank may administer the account in accordance with the certificate of trust without requiring receipt of a copy of the written trust agreement; and

For a transaction that consists of obtaining, guaranteeing, or encumbering trust property to secure a loan, or entering into any agreement with a bank, the trustee or trustees shall be conclusively presumed to have had the authority specified in the trust certificate for purposes of determining whether the trustees were acting within their authority in entering into, or causing the trust to enter into, a transaction, even if the certificate of trust is contrary to the terms of the written trust agreement, unless the bank has actual knowledge that the terms of the written trust agreement are contrary to the terms of the certificate of trust.

If a bank decides to accept a certificate of trust in opening a deposit account pursuant to this section, upon the death, resignation, or adjudication of incompetence of all named trustees and successor trustees noted on the certificate of trust, the bank may withhold disposition of any funds on deposit in the account until receipt of one of the following:

An order by a court of competent jurisdiction directing the disposition of funds;

A newly executed certificate of trust created pursuant to this section from a person acting or purporting to act as a newly appointed successor trustee under the same trust; or

Other documentation that establishes to the satisfaction of the bank the manner in which the funds are to be administered or distributed.

If a bank decides to accept a certificate of trust in opening a deposit account pursuant to this section, the bank shall not be liable for administering the account as provided by the certificate of trust, even if the certificate of trust is contrary to the terms of the written trust agreement, unless the bank has actual knowledge that the terms of the written trust agreement are contrary to the terms of the certificate of trust.

Nothing in this section obligates a bank to enter into a transaction with a trustee who refuses to furnish the bank with a copy of a written trust agreement. In addition, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a bank from requesting additional information in order to enter into a transaction with a trustee, including a request that the certificate of trust be executed by all trustees.

Knowledge of the terms of a written trust agreement may not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of a written trust agreement is held by the person relying upon the certification or affidavit.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 453, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1157), ch. 77, p. 240, § 1, effective March 23.

11-105-112. Entity account - certificate of existence and authority - definitions.

For any deposit or loan account that is opened by one or more persons acting or purporting to act for or on behalf of an entity with any financial institution transacting business in this state, such person may provide the financial institution with a certificate to evidence the existence of the entity and the authority of such person to act for or on behalf of the entity with respect to the account. The certificate of existence and authority shall be an affidavit executed by such person and shall include the following, as applicable:

The name and mailing address of the entity;

The type of entity and the state, country, or other governmental authority under whose laws the entity was formed;

The organization date of the entity;

The name, mailing address, and office or other position held by the person executing the certificate; and

A statement that the board of directors, managers, members, general partners, or other governing body of the entity opening the account has duly taken all action legally required to open the account in the name of the entity and the name, office, or other position of the person who has been duly authorized to engage in transactions with respect to the account, including any limitation that may exist upon the authority of such person to bind the entity and any other matters concerning the manner in which such person may deal with the account. If the deposit or loan is to be opened on behalf of an institution of higher education, the statement shall be accompanied by a resolution certified by the secretary of the governing board.

If a financial institution accepts a certificate of existence and authority pursuant to this section, the financial institution may open and administer the account in accordance with the information set forth therein and shall not be liable for so doing even if any such information is inaccurate, unless the financial institution has actual knowledge of such inaccuracy or knowledge sufficient to cause a reasonably prudent person to doubt the accuracy of such information.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a financial institution from requesting additional information or requiring other agreements in order to establish a deposit or loan account for an entity, including without limitation a resolution, certificate of good standing, trade name registration, request for taxpayer identification number, entity agreements, or documents or parts thereof evidencing the existence of the entity or the authority of the person executing the certificate, and an indemnification that is acceptable to the financial institution.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Entity" means any government or governmental subdivision or agency, and any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, limited partnership association, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, joint venture, cooperative, association, or other legal entity, whether operated for profit or not for profit.

"Financial institution" means any federal or state chartered commercial bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 359, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2013:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1484, § 55, effective July 1.